Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 8
FEES

44-10-801. Marijuana cash fund.

All money collected by the state licensing authority pursuant to this article 10 must be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the marijuana cash fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this section as the "fund". The fund consists of:

The money collected by the state licensing authority; and

Any additional general fund money appropriated to the fund that is necessary for the operation of the state licensing authority.

Money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the department for the direct and indirect costs associated with implementing this article 10 and article 28.8 of title 39.

Any money in the fund not expended for these purposes may be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of money in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year remains in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund.

Repealed.

The executive director by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3) to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the executive director by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of one or more of the fees as provided in section 24-75-402 (4).

The state licensing authority shall establish fees for processing the following types of applications, licenses, notices, or reports required to be submitted to the state licensing authority:

Applications for licenses listed in section 44-10-401 and rules promulgated pursuant to that section;

Applications to change location pursuant to section 44-10-313 (13) and rules promulgated pursuant to that section;

Applications for transfer of ownership pursuant to section 44-10-312 and rules promulgated pursuant to that section;

License renewal and expired license renewal applications pursuant to section 44-10-314; and

Licenses as listed in section 44-10-401.

The amounts of such fees, when added to the other fees transferred to the fund pursuant to this section, must reflect the actual direct and indirect costs of the state licensing authority in the administration and enforcement of this article 10 so that the fees avoid exceeding the statutory limit on uncommitted reserves in administrative agency cash funds as set forth in section 24-75-402 (3).

The state licensing authority may charge applicants licensed under this article 10 a fee for the cost of each fingerprint analysis and background investigation undertaken to qualify new officers, directors, managers, or employees.

At least annually, the state licensing authority shall review the amounts of the fees and, if necessary, adjust the amounts to reflect the direct and indirect costs of the state licensing authority.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the state licensing authority shall establish a basic fee that shall be paid at the time of service of any subpoena upon the state licensing authority, plus a fee for meals and a fee for mileage at the rate prescribed for state officers and employees in section 24-9-104 for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in going to and returning from the place named in the subpoena. If the person named in the subpoena is required to attend the place named in the subpoena for more than one day, there must be paid, in advance, a sum to be established by the state licensing authority for each day of attendance to cover the expenses of the person named in the subpoena.

The subpoena fee established pursuant to subsection (4) of this section is not applicable to any federal, state, or local governmental agency.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2926, § 5, effective January 1, 2020; (1)(d)(III) added, (SB 19-213), ch. 139, p. 1741, § 2, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2020:

(1)(d)(IV) added, (HB 20-1406), ch. 178, p. 814, § 23, effective June 29.

L. 2021:

(1)(e) added, (SB 21-283), ch. 303, p. 1820, § 2, effective June 23; (1)(d) repealed, (HB 21-1178), ch. 130, p. 526, § 8, effective September 7.

44-10-802. Fees - allocation.

Except as otherwise provided, all fees and fines provided for by this article 10 shall be paid to the department, which shall transmit the fees to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall credit the fees to the marijuana cash fund created in section 44-10-801.

The expenditures of the state licensing authority are paid out of appropriations from the marijuana cash fund created in section 44-10-801.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2928, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 44-11-502 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-10-803. Fees.

The state licensing authority may charge and collect fees pursuant to this article 10. For a person licensed to cultivate or sell medical marijuana or to manufacture medical marijuana products on or before December 10, 2012, the application fee for a retail marijuana business is five hundred dollars. The state licensing authority shall transfer two hundred fifty dollars of the fee to the marijuana cash fund and submit two hundred fifty dollars to the local jurisdiction in which the license is proposed to be issued.

Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the application fee for a retail marijuana business is five thousand dollars. The state licensing authority shall transfer two thousand five hundred dollars of the fee to the marijuana cash fund and remit two thousand five hundred dollars to the local jurisdiction in which the license is proposed to be issued. If the state licensing authority is considering raising the five-thousand-dollar application fee, it shall confer with each local jurisdiction in which a license pursuant to this article 10 is issued prior to raising the application fee. If the application fee amount is changed, it must be split evenly between the marijuana cash fund and the local jurisdiction in which the license is proposed to be issued.

A local jurisdiction in which a license under this article 10 may be permitted may adopt and impose operating fees in an amount determined by the local jurisdiction on marijuana businesses and establishments located within the local jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2928, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 44-12-501 as it existed prior to 2020.